Hawaii statutes.
§662-12 Attorney's fees. The court
rendering a judgment for the plaintiff pursuant to this chapter or the attorney
general making a disposition pursuant to section 662-11 may, as a part of such
judgment, award, or settlement, determine and allow reasonable attorney's fees
which shall not, however, exceed twenty-five per cent of the amount recovered
and shall be payable out of the judgment awarded to the plaintiff; provided
that such limitation shall not include attorney's fees and costs that the court
may award the plaintiff as a matter of its sanctions. [L 1957, c 312, pt of §1;
Supp, §245A-12; HRS §662-12; am L 1979, c 152, §4]

Case Notes

Attorney's fee may be awarded in addition to judgment. 51 H.
540, 465 P.2d 580 (1970).

Trial court has discretion in awarding attorney's fees. 54
H. 611, 513 P.2d 487 (1973).

Mentioned: 76 H. 487, 879 P.2d 1070 (1994).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next